District of Columbia statutes.
10-805

Secretary of the Interior to sell certain real estate — Solicitation for bids.

In selling any parcel of land under this subchapter, said Secretary shall cause such public or private solicitation for bids or offers to be made as he may deem appropriate, and shall sell the parcel to the party agreeing to pay the highest price therefor if such price is otherwise satisfactory; provided, that in the event the price offered or bid by the owner of any lands abutting the lands to be sold equals the highest price offered or bid by any other party, the parcel may be sold to such abutting owner.

Aug. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 1211, ch. 449, § 5
1981 Ed., § 9-405.
1973 Ed., § 9-305.